Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.100

Bonds—Duration—Release of surety—Cancellation by surety.

(1) Every bond filed with and approved by the department shall without the necessity of periodic renewal remain in force and effect until such time as the warehouse operator or grain dealer license of each principal on the bond is revoked or otherwise canceled.

(2) The surety on a bond, as provided in this chapter, shall be released and discharged from all liability to the state, as to a principal whose license is revoked or canceled, which liability accrues after the expiration of thirty days from the effective date of the revocation or cancellation of the license. The surety on a bond under this chapter shall be released and discharged from all liability to the state accruing on the bond after the expiration of ninety days from the date upon which the surety lodges with the department a written request to be released and discharged. Nothing in this section shall operate to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from any liability which accrues before the expiration of the respective thirty or ninety-day period. In the event of a cancellation by the surety, the surety shall simultaneously send the notification of cancellation in writing to any other governmental agency requesting it. Upon receiving any such request, the department shall promptly notify the principal or principals who furnished the bond, and unless the principal or principals file a new bond on or before the expiration of the respective thirty or ninety-day period, the department shall forthwith cancel the license of the principal or principals whose bond has been canceled.

[ 2011 c 336 s 605; 1987 c 509 s 4; 1983 c 305 s 28; 1963 c 124 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.